Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska80-413
Land used for veterans services; retrocession of jurisdiction.

(1) The consent of the State of Nebraska is hereby given to the retrocession of jurisdiction, either partially or wholly, by the Veterans' Administration, an agency of the United States Government, over land owned by the United States within the boundaries of Nebraska, and the Governor of the state is hereby authorized to accept for the state such retrocession of jurisdiction.

(2) Retrocession of jurisdiction shall be effected upon written notice to the Governor by the principal officer of the Veterans' Administration having supervision and control over the land.

(3) This section shall apply only to the following lands:

(a) Land on which is located the Veterans' Administration Hospital, Omaha, Nebraska;

(b) Land on which is located the Veterans' Administration Hospital, Lincoln, Nebraska;

(c) Land on which is located the Veterans' Administration Hospital, Grand Island, Nebraska;

(d) Land on which is located the Fort McPherson National Cemetery, Maxwell, Nebraska; and

(e) Land on which is located the Omaha National Cemetery, Sarpy County, Nebraska.

Laws 1975, LB 391, § 1;

Laws 2015, LB640, § 1.